third_party/liblouis/src/tables/no-no-g3.ctb
endword nad 25-1246
endword nadar 25-1246-3456
endword nadars 25-1246-3456-234
endword naden 25-1246-126
endword nadens 25-1246-126-234
endword nader 25-1246-156
endword naders 25-1246-156-234
endword nadet 25-1246-346
endword nadets 25-1246-346-234
endword nadne 25-1246-2346
endword nade 26-1246
endword nadene 26-1246-2346
endword nadenes 26-1246-2346-234
endword nadere 26-1246-12356
endword nadere 26-1246-12356-234

# word natur 1345-2345							# defined in level 2 contractions
# begword unatur 136-1345-2345						# level 3 contractions

word naturligvis 1345-2345-1236

# word nedenfor 1345-1246						# defined in level 2 contractions
# word nedenfra 1345-124            # defined in level 2 contractions

begword une 136-2346
begword ne 2346
word nemlig 1345-123				
# word neppe 1345-1234							# defined in level 2 contractions
word nettopp 1345-2345-1234
# begword noen 1345-1345						# defined in level 2 contractions
word noenlunde 1345-1345-123
word noensinne 1345-1345-234
# word noko 1345-13									# defined in level 2 contractions
# word nokon 1345-13-1345						# defined in level 2 contractions
# word nokre 1345-13-12356					# defined in level 2 contractions

word nødvendig 1345-1236
begword nødvendig 1345-1236
word unødvendign 136-1345-1236
begword unødvendig 136-1345-1236


# word når 1345										# defined in level 2 contractions
# word og 14											# defined in level 1
# word også												# defined in level 1

word omkring 135-134-13											# level 3 contractions
word omtrent 135-134-2345

# word oss												# defined in level 1
# word og 14											# defined in level 1
# word også												# defined in level 1
# word oss												# defined in level 1
# word ovenfor 135-1246						# defined in level 2 contractions
# word ovenfra 135-124						# defined in level 2 contractions
# word over												# defined in level 1
# over														# defined in level 2 contractions
# begword overgang 1346-1245-1245 # defined in level 2 contractions
word oppmerksom 135-1234-134
word uoppmerksom 136-135-1234-134

word pakk 1234-13
begword pakk 1234-13
endword pakk 1234-13
word plutselig 1234-25-123
begword pr 25

# always punkt 1234-13-2345				# defined in level 2 contractions
# word på 1234										# defined in level 1
# re															# defined in level 2 contractions

word riktig 1235-1245
word uriktig 136-1235-1245
begword riktig 1235-1245
begword uriktig 136-1235-1245

endword sam 25-146
endword samar 25-146-3456
endword samars 25-146-3456-234
endword samen 25-146-126
endword samens 25-146-126-234
endword samer 25-146-156
endword samers 25-146-156-234
endword samet 25-146-346
endword samets 25-146-346-234
endword samne 25-146-2346
endword samnes 25-146-2346-234
endword samte 25-146-1256
endword samtes 25-146-1256-234
endword samre 25-146-12356
endword samres 25-146-12356-234
endword samt 25-146-2345
endword same 26-146
endword samene 26-146-2346
endword samenes 26-146-2346-234
endword samere 26-146-12356

# word samme 234-134							# defined level 2 contractions
# sammen													# defined level 2 contractions

begword sannsyn 234-234									# level 3 contractions
begword usannsyn 136-234-234
begword sannsynleg 234-234-25-1245
begword usannsynleg 136-234-234-25-1245
begword sannsynlig 234-234-25-123
begword usannsynlig 136-234-234-25-123
word sannsynligvis 234-234-1236					# level 3 contractions

# word seg 234-1245								# defined level 2 contractions
# word selv 234-1236							# defined level 2 contractions

word sidan 234-145											# level 3 contractions
word simpelthen 234-1234-125

# word sin 234-1345								# defined level 2 contractions
# word sitt 234-2345							# defined level 2 contractions

word sjeldan 234-245-145								# level 3 contractions
word sjelden 234-245-145-126
word sjeldne 234-245-145-2346
endword sjon 25-1345
endword sjonar 25-1345-3456
endword sjonars 25-1345-3456-234
endword sjonen 25-1345-126
endword sjonens 25-1345-126-234
endword sjoner 25-1345-156
endword sjoners 25-1345-156-234
endword sjonet 25-1345-346
endword sjonane 25-1345-1-2346
endword sjonanes 25-1345-1-2346-234
endword sjone 26-1345
endword sjonene 26-1345-2346
endword sjonenes 26-1345-2346-234

# word sjøl 234-245								# defined level 2 contractions
# sjølv														# defined level 2 contractions
begword sk 2356
endword sk 2356
# word skal 123456								# defined level 2 contractions
endword skap 25-1234
endword skaps 25-1234-234
endword skapar 25-1234-3456
endword skapars 25-1234-3456-234
endword skapen 25-1234-126
endword skapens 25-1234-126-234
endword skaper 25-1234-156
endword skapers 25-1234-156-234
endword skapet 25-1234-346
endword skapets 25-1234-346-234
endword skape 26-1234
endword skapene 26-1234-2346
endword skapenes 26-1234-2346-234
endword enskap 126-25-1234
endword enskapar 126-25-1234-3456
endword enskapars 126-25-1234-3456-234
endword enskapen 126-25-1234-126
endword enskapens 126-25-1234-126-234
endword enskaper 126-25-1234-156
endword enskapers 126-25-1234-156-234
endword enskapet 126-25-1234-346
endword enskapets 126-25-1234-346-234
endword enskape 126-26-1234
endword enskapene 126-26-1234-2346
endword enskapenes 126-26-1234-2346-234
endword erskap 156-25-1234
endword erskapar 156-25-1234-3456
endword erskapars 156-25-1234-3456-234
endword erskapen 156-25-1234-126
endword erskapens 156-25-1234-126-234
endword erskaper 156-25-1234-156
endword erskapers 156-25-1234-156-234
endword erskapet 156-25-1234-346
endword erskapets 156-25-1234-346-234
endword erskape 156-26-1234
endword erskapene 156-26-1234-2346
endword erskapenes 156-26-1234-2346-234

begword skr 123456
# word skulla 123456-1						# defined level 2 contractions
# word skulle 123456-15						# defined level 2 contractions
# word skullet 123456-346					# defined level 2 contractions
# word snart 234-1235							# defined level 2 contractions
# word som 234										# defined in level 1

endword som 25-234											# level 3 contractions
endword somt 25-234-2345
endword somme 26-234
endword sommere 26-234-12356
endword sommene 26-234-2346
begword sp 235													# level 3 contractions

# always spørsmål 234-1234-134		# defined level 2 contractions

begword st 356													# level 3 contractions

# word tatt 2345-2345							# defined level 2 contractions

word te 1256
begword te 1256

begword ute 136-1256
word uten 136-2345-126
endword uten 136-2345-126

word temmelig 2345-134									# level 3 contractions

always til\sog\smed 2345-14-146
begword tr 26

word vanske 1236-14
begword vanske 1236-14
begword vanskeleg 1236-14-25-1245
begword vanskelig 1236-14-25-123

word vedtatt 1236-2345-2345							# level 3 contractions
word verken 1236-13
endword vis 25-1236
endword visar 25-1236-3456
endword visars 25-1236-3456-234
endword visen 25-1236-126
endword visens 25-1236-126-234
endword viser 25-1236-156
endword visers 25-1236-156-234
endword viset 25-1236-346
endword visets 25-1236-346-234
endword visne 25-1236-2346
endword visnes 25-1236-2346-234
endword viste 25-1236-1256
endword vistes 25-1236-1256-234
endword vist 25-1236-2345

# word viss 1236-234							# defined level 2 contractions
# word uviss 136-1236-234					# defined level 2 contractions

# --------------------- End level 3 contracions ---------------------------
